Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 1. State Highway Law; General Transportation Provisions

§ 1.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Agency” means the Agency of Transportation.

“Board” means the Transportation Board.

“Branch” means a major component of a division of a department or major unit of a department with staff functions.

“Chair” means the Chair of the Transportation Board, unless otherwise specified.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles responsible to the Secretary for the administration of the Department.

“Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

“Develop” means the partition or division of any tract of land of any size by a person through sale, lease, transfer, or any other means by which any interest in or to the land or a portion of the land is conveyed to another person that will require the construction of permanent new or enlarged points of access to a State or town highway other than a limited access facility pursuant to subsection 1702a(a) of this title; excluding, however, tracts of land located entirely within a city or incorporated village.

“Director” means the head of a division.

“District” means a geographic subdivision of the State primarily established for maintenance purposes.

“District transportation administrator” means the person in charge of a district.

“Division” means a major unit of the Agency engaged in line functions other than the Department of Motor Vehicles.

“Highways” are only such as are laid out in the manner prescribed by statute; or roads that have been constructed for public travel over land that has been conveyed to and accepted by a municipal corporation or to the State by deed of a fee or easement interest; or roads that have been dedicated to the public use and accepted by the city or town in which such roads are located; or such as may be from time to time laid out by the Agency or town. However, the lack of a certificate of completion of a State or town highway shall not alone constitute conclusive evidence that the highway is not public. The term “highway” includes rights-of-way, bridges, drainage structures, signs, guardrails, areas to accommodate utilities authorized by law to locate within highway limits, areas used to mitigate the environmental impacts of highway construction, vegetation, scenic enhancements, and structures. The term “highway” does not include State forest highways, management roads, easements, or rights-of-way owned by or under the control of the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Environmental Conservation.

“Management road” means a road not designated as a “State forest highway” used for the long-term management of lands owned by or under the control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Environmental Conservation to meet the responsibilities and purposes set forth in 10 V.S.A. chapter 83, 10 V.S.A. part 4, and rules adopted under those statutes. The term “management road” includes associated easements and rights-of-way. A “management road” is not a “highway” or a “town highway” as defined in this title, is not a public road, and the public has no common law or statutory right of access or use of such a road. A “management road” may be open for temporary, seasonal uses by the public or may be closed temporarily or seasonally at the discretion of the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Environmental Conservation. A “management road” may be closed permanently upon 30 days’ notice to the governing body of the municipality in which the road is located and any affected user groups. Designation of a road as a “management road” shall not diminish any deeded rights-of-way or easements of private landowners on lands owned or controlled by the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Environmental Conservation.

“Person” includes a municipality or State agency.

“Scenic road” means any road designated pursuant to this title.

“Secretary” means the head of the Agency who shall be a member of the Governor’s Cabinet responsible directly to the Governor for the administration of the Agency.

“Section” means a major component of a division or department or major unit of the Agency.

“Selectboard” includes village trustees and city councils.

“State forest highway” means a road used for the long-term management of lands owned by or under the control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to meet the responsibilities and purposes set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 2601

et seq. and rules adopted under that statute. The term “State forest highway” includes easements and rights-of-way. A “State forest highway” is not a “highway” or a “town highway” as defined in this title, is not a public road, and the public has no common law or statutory right of access or use of such road. A “State forest highway” may be open for temporary, seasonal uses by the public or may be closed temporarily or seasonally for any reason at the discretion of the Agency of Natural Resources or the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation. A “State forest highway” may be closed permanently upon 30 days’ notice to the governing body of the municipality in which the road is located and to any affected user groups. Designation of a road as a “State forest highway” shall not diminish any deeded rights-of-way or easements of private landowners on lands owned or controlled by the Agency of Natural Resources or the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

“State highways” are those highways maintained exclusively by the Agency of Transportation.

“Throughway” means a highway specially designated giving traffic traveling on the throughway the right of way at all intersections.

“Town” includes incorporated villages and cities.

“Town highways” are class 1, 2, 3, and 4 highways:

that the towns have authority to exclusively or cooperatively maintain; or

that are maintained by the towns except for scheduled surface maintenance performed by the Agency pursuant to section 306a of this title.

“Traffic Committee” consists of the Secretary of Transportation or designee, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee, and the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee and is responsible for establishing speed zones, parking and no parking areas, rules for use of limited access highways, approval of the testing of automated vehicles as defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4202

on public highways, and other traffic control procedures.

“Limited access highway” means a highway where the right of owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons to access, light, air, or view in connection with the highway is fully or partially controlled by public authority, in accordance with chapter 17 of this title. The term “highway” does not include State forest highways, management roads, easements, or rights-of-way owned by or under the control of the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Environmental Conservation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 61

, § 39, eff. June 3, 1993;

1995, No. 60

, § 39, eff. April 25, 1995;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 18h, 18k, eff. May 22, 1996;

2003, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 3, 2004;

2009, No. 50

, § 88;

2011, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2019, No. 60

, § 17.

§ 2.
Composition of Agency.

The Agency shall be composed of the following:

the Department of Motor Vehicles;

such divisions as the Secretary finds necessary to carry out the provisions of Titles 5 and 19, as well as any other duties imposed by law on the Agency or the Secretary; and

all other boards, councils, committees, or components assigned to or created within the Agency.

The following units are attached to the Agency for administrative support only:

Traffic Committee;

Travel Information Council; and

all transportation and transit authorities established by law or executive order.

The Agency shall administer the provisions of Titles 5, 19, and 23, other than those involving quasi-judicial or regulatory functions assigned to the Board.

The Agency shall also administer other related provisions of law as may be made applicable by law or executive order and perform other functions as may be assigned to it by law or order.

In addition to the authority and administrative jurisdiction set forth in subsection (c) of this section, the Agency shall have the authority and administrative jurisdiction to develop, promote, supervise, and support safe and adequate transportation services.

There shall be a section within the Agency dedicated to assisting municipalities and regions in the development and implementation of locally managed transportation projects.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 121

, § 15;

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 15, 1992;

1993, No. 61

, § 8, eff. June 3, 1993;

1995, No. 60

, § 18, eff. April 25, 1995;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 18b, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 38

, § 6c, eff. May 28, 1997.

§ 3.
Transportation Board; creation; members.

A transportation board is formed to be attached to the Agency of Transportation. There shall be seven members of the Board, appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Governor shall so far as is possible appoint Board members whose interests and expertise lie in various areas of the transportation field. The Governor shall appoint the chair. The members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of three years. Board members may be appointed for two additional three-year terms but shall not be eligible for further reappointment. No more than four members of the Board shall belong to the same political party. No member of the Board shall:

Have an ownership interest in or be employed by a manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch as defined in 9 V.S.A. chapter 108.

Have an ownership interest in or be a new motor vehicle dealer or an employee of a new motor vehicle dealer as defined in 9 V.S.A. chapter 108.

Be employed by an association of motor vehicle dealers, manufacturers, or distributors as defined in 9 V.S.A. chapter 108.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2009, No. 57

, § 2.

§ 4.
Transportation Board; meetings; quorum; compensation.

The Board shall hold meetings as may be required for the performance of its duties and shall meet at such times and places as may be designated by the Chair.
The Chair shall call a meeting upon the written request of the Governor or the written request of two Board members.
A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum.
The members of the Board shall receive a per diem as provided by Title 32 for the time actually spent in work authorized by the Board and shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses while away from home.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5.
Transportation Board; powers and duties.

The regulatory and quasi-judicial functions relating to transportation shall be vested in the Board, except that the duties and responsibilities of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles in Titles 23 and 32, including all quasi-judicial powers, shall continue to be vested in the Commissioner.

Except as otherwise authorized by law, the Board is the sole authority responsible for naming transportation facilities owned, controlled, or maintained by the State, including highways and the bridges thereon, airports, rail facilities, rest areas, and welcome centers. The Board shall exercise its naming authority only upon petition of the legislative body of a municipality of the State, of the head of an Executive Branch agency or department of the State, or of 50 Vermont residents.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise authorized by law, the Board is the sole authority responsible for naming transportation facilities owned, controlled, or maintained by the State, including highways and the bridges thereon, airports, rail facilities, rest areas, and welcome centers. The Board shall exercise its naming authority only upon petition of the legislative body of a municipality of the State, of the head of an Executive Branch agency or department of the State, or of 50 Vermont residents.

The Board shall hold a public hearing for each facility requested to be named. The Board shall adopt rules governing notice and conduct of hearings, the standards to be applied in rendering decisions under this subsection, and any other matter necessary for the just disposition of naming requests. The Board shall issue a decision, which shall be subject to review on the record by a Superior Court pursuant to Rule 74 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. The Board may delegate the responsibility to hold a hearing to a hearing officer or a single Board member, subject to the procedure of subsection (c) of this section, but shall not be bound by 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 in carrying out its duties under this subsection.

The Board may delegate the responsibility to hear quasi-judicial matters, and other matters as it may deem appropriate, to a hearing examiner or a single Board member, to hear a case and make findings in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, except that highway condemnation proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 5 of this title. A hearing examiner or single Board member so appointed shall report the findings of fact in writing to the Board. Any order resulting from those findings shall be rendered only by a majority of the Board. Final orders of the Board issued pursuant to section 20 of this title may be reviewed on the record by a Superior Court pursuant to Rule 74 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. All other final orders of the Board may be reviewed on the record by the Supreme Court.

The Board shall:

hear appeals from Agency decisions and rulings regarding measurement, description, or reclassification of town highways pursuant to section 305 of this title;

hear and determine small claims pursuant to section 20 of this title;

provide appellate review, when requested in writing, of decisions of the Secretary of Transportation when he or she assumes the powers and duties of a selectboard in highway matters in unorganized towns and gores pursuant to section 16 of this title;

provide appellate review, when requested in writing, regarding legal disputes in the execution of contracts awarded by the Agency or by municipalities cooperating with the Agency to advance projects in the State’s Transportation Program;

provide appellate review, when requested in writing, of decisions of the Secretary in administering the provisions of Title 24, relating to junkyards;

provide appellate review when requested in writing, regarding the fairness of rents and fees charged for the occupancy or use of State-owned properties administered by the Agency;

provide appellate review, when requested in writing, of Agency decisions and rulings regarding private and commercial access to State highway rights-of-way pursuant to the permit process established in section 1111 of this title;

in coordination with the Agency, hold public hearings for the purpose of obtaining public comment on the development of State transportation policy, the mission of the Agency, and State transportation planning, capital programming, and program implementation;

hear and determine disputes involving the decision of a selectboard under subdivision 302(a)(3)(B) or subsection 310(a) of this title not to plow and make negotiable a class 2 or 3 town highway or section of a highway during the winter or involving discontinuances of class 3 or 4 town highways extending into adjacent towns under the provisions of subsection 771(c) of this title;

when requested by the Secretary, conduct public hearings on matters of public interest, after which it shall transmit its findings and recommendations to the Secretary and the Chairs of the Senate and House Committees on Transportation in a report that shall be a public document;

enforce all provisions and hear and determine all disputes arising out of 9 V.S.A. chapter 108, the Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers Franchising Practices Act;

maintain the accounting functions for the duties imposed by 9 V.S.A. chapter 108 separately from the accounting functions relating to its other duties;

hear and determine disputes involving a determination of the Agency under section 309c of this title that the municipality is responsible for repayment of federal funds required by the Federal Highway Administration.

Suitable offices and office equipment shall be provided by the State for the Board at Montpelier. The Board may employ clerical or other employees and assistants whom it deems necessary in the performance of its duties and in the investigation of matters within its jurisdiction.

The Board shall have the power to determine and adjudicate all matters over which it is given jurisdiction. It may render judgments and make orders and decrees. Whenever the Board is sitting in a quasi-judicial capacity, it may issue subpoenas for the testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence. The fees for travel and attendance of witnesses shall be the same as for witnesses and officers appearing before a Civil Division of the Superior Court.

From time to time, the Board may report to the General Assembly with suggestions of amendment to existing law or of new legislation as it deems necessary and any information concerning the companies, matters, and things under the jurisdiction of the Board and Agency that, in its opinion, will be of interest to the General Assembly.

Unless otherwise provided by law, when an appeal is allowed from the Agency to the Board, the appeal shall be taken by filing a notice of appeal with the Secretary within 30 days of the date of the Agency decision from which the appeal is taken. The Secretary shall promptly forward the notice of appeal to the Board, together with the Agency’s record of decision.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 121

, § 20a;

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. May 29, 2000;

2001, No. 64

, § 11, eff. June 16, 2001;

2005, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2007, No. 75

, § 36;

2009, No. 57

, § 3;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 27, 29;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2015, No. 40

, § 27, eff. March 1, 2016;

2015, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2021, No. 20

, § 75.

§ 5a.
Executive Secretary.

The Board shall appoint an Executive Secretary, who shall serve during its pleasure. The Board members and Executive Secretary shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of the duties of their offices.

The Executive Secretary shall have general charge of the office of the Board, keep a full record of its proceedings, file and preserve at its office or in public records all documents and papers entrusted to his or her care, prepare those papers and notices as may be required of him or her by the Board, and perform other duties that the Board may prescribe. The Executive Secretary shall have power, under the direction of the Board, to issue subpoenas for witnesses and to administer oaths in all cases before the Board or pertaining to the duties of the office.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5b.
Conflicts of interest.

A person in the employ of or holding any official relation to any company subject to the supervision of the Board or the Agency, or engaged in the management of a company that is subject to the supervision of the Board or Agency, or owning stock, bonds, or other securities in the company, or who is in any manner connected with the operation of a company that is subject to the supervision of the Board or Agency in this State, shall not be a member or Executive Secretary of the Board or Secretary of Transportation.

No person holding the office of member, Executive Secretary of the Board, or Secretary of Transportation, either personally or in connection with a partner or agent, may:

render professional service for or against or make or perform any business contract with any company subject to Board or Agency supervision, relating to the business of the company, except contracts made with them as common carriers or in the regular course of public service; or

directly or indirectly receive from a company subject to Board or Agency supervision any commission, present, or reward.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 6.
Other boards, commissions, councils, and committees.

All other boards, commissions, councils, and committees that under this chapter are a part of the Agency shall be advisory only.

The Transportation Board is successor to the Public Service Board, the Highway Board, and the Aeronautics Board in the regulatory and quasi-judicial functions related to transportation. It may enforce all orders of those boards that remain in effect.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 7.
Secretary; powers and duties.

The Agency shall be under the direction and supervision of a Secretary, who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Secretary shall be responsible to the Governor and shall plan, coordinate, and direct the functions vested in the Agency in accord with the transportation policies established under this title.

The Secretary may, with the approval of the Governor, transfer classified positions between the Department, divisions, and other components of the Agency, subject only to personnel laws and rules.

The Secretary shall determine the administrative, operational, and functional policies of the Agency and be accountable to the Governor for these determinations. The Secretary shall exercise the powers and shall perform the duties required for the Agency’s effective administration.

In addition to other duties imposed by law, the Secretary shall:

administer the laws assigned to the Agency;

coordinate and integrate the work of the Agency;

supervise and control all staff functions; and

whenever the Agency is developing preliminary plans for a new or replacement maintenance facility or salt shed, first conduct a review of all previously developed building plans and give priority to utilizing a common, uniform, and preexisting design.

The Secretary may, within the authority of relevant State and federal statutes and regulations:

Transfer appropriations or parts of appropriations within or between the Department, divisions, and sections.

Cooperate with the appropriate federal agencies and receive federal funds in support of programs within the Agency.

Submit plans and reports, and in other respects comply with federal laws and regulations that pertain to programs administered by the Agency.

Make rules consistent with the law for the internal administration of the Agency and its programs.

Create advisory councils or committees as he or she deems necessary within the Agency and appoint the members for a term not exceeding his or hers. Councils or committees created pursuant to this subdivision may include persons who are not officers or employees of the Agency.

Provide training and instruction for employees of the Agency at the expense of the Agency, and provide training and instruction for employees of Vermont municipalities. Where appropriate, the Secretary may provide training and instruction for municipal employees at the expense of the Agency.

Organize, reorganize, transfer, or abolish sections and staff function sections within the Agency; except however, the Secretary may not alter the number of highway districts without legislative approval.

[Repealed.]

Any and all functions and duties required by law, rules, or policy to be performed by the Secretary or the Agency may be delegated by him or her to any person or component of the Agency that the Secretary deems appropriate.

The Secretary, with the approval of the Governor, may appoint, outside the classified service, a Deputy Secretary to serve at his or her pleasure and to perform such duties as the Secretary may prescribe. The appointment shall be in writing and recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State. The Deputy Secretary shall discharge the duties and responsibilities of the Secretary in the Secretary’s absence. In case a vacancy occurs in the Office of the Secretary, the Deputy shall assume and discharge the duties of office until the vacancy is filled.

The Secretary shall assume the powers and duties of a selectboard in highway matters in unorganized towns and gores pursuant to section 16 of this title.

The Secretary may, after consulting with the Secretary of Natural Resources, adopt rules governing public access to and use of environmental mitigation sites administered by the Agency of Transportation. Signs indicating the rules shall be conspicuously posted in or near all areas affected. Any person who violates these rules shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $300.00.

Upon being apprised of the enactment of a federal law that makes provision for a federal earmark or the award of a discretionary federal grant for a transportation project within the State of Vermont, the Agency shall promptly notify the members of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation and the Joint Fiscal Office. Such notification shall include all available summary information regarding the terms and conditions of the federal earmark or grant. As used in this section, “federal earmark” means a congressional designation of federal aid funds for a specific transportation project or program. When the General Assembly is not in session, upon obtaining the approval of the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee, the Agency is authorized to add new projects to the Transportation Program in order to secure the benefits of federal earmarks or discretionary grants.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1988;

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 49;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 14, 15;

1995, No. 60

, § 19, eff. April 25, 1995;

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. May 29, 2000;

2001, No. 64

, § 20, eff. June 16, 2001;

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2013, No. 12

, § 19;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2015, No. 40

, § 16;

2021, No. 20

, § 76.

§ 7a.
Hearing before Secretary.

In the administration of the laws relating to highways, the Secretary may conduct hearings, subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony. He or she may also cause depositions to be taken and order the production of books, papers, and records relating to the matter under investigation. The fees for travel and attendance of witnesses and fees for officers shall be the same as for witnesses and officers before a Civil Division of the Superior Court and shall be paid by the State upon presentation of proper bills of cost to the Commissioner of Finance and Management. The fees of witnesses summoned or used by the petitioner shall be paid by him or her. The Secretary may appoint a hearing examiner to conduct hearings.

A person aggrieved by the decision of a hearing under subsection (a) of this section may have the decision reviewed on the record by the Superior Court pursuant to Rule 74 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure unless otherwise specifically provided by law.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 61

, § 9, eff. June 3, 1993; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 8.
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles; appointment; duties and powers.

The Secretary shall, with the approval of the Governor and with the advice and consent of the Senate, appoint a Commissioner of Motor Vehicles who shall administer the Department of Motor Vehicles and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary. The term of a Commissioner shall be concurrent with that of the Secretary.

The Commissioner shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, have all the duties and responsibilities of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles in Title 23 with regard to the suspension and revocation of licenses and all other quasi-judicial duties assigned in that title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 9.
Divisions; general provisions.

A director shall administer each division created within the Agency. The Secretary shall appoint the directors, who shall be exempt from the classified service. The Director of the Highway Division shall be licensed as a professional engineer.

The Secretary, Deputy Secretary, Commissioner, Deputy Commissioner, attorneys, and all members of the boards, committees, commissions, or councils that are attached to the Agency for support are exempt from the classified State service. Except as authorized by

3 V.S.A. § 311

or otherwise by law, all other positions shall be within the classified service.

A director, with the approval of the Secretary, may appoint an assistant from existing staff.

No rule or regulation may be issued by a director of a division without the approval of the Secretary or designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 238b;

1993, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 17, 1994;

2015, No. 40

, § 19.

§ 10.
Duties.

The Agency shall, except where otherwise specifically provided by law:

Award contracts on terms as it deems to be in the best interests of the State for the construction, repair, or maintenance of transportation related facilities; for the use of any machinery or equipment either with or without operators or drivers; for the operation, repair, maintenance, or storage of any State-owned machinery or equipment; for professional engineering services, inspection of work or materials, diving services, mapping services, photographic services, including aerial photography or surveys, and any other services, with or without equipment, in connection with the planning, construction, and maintenance of transportation facilities. Persons rendering these services shall not be within the classified service, and the services shall not entitle the provider to rights under any State retirement system. Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. chapter 13, the Agency may contract for services also provided by individuals in the classified service, either at present or at some time in the past. The solicitation and award of contracts by the Agency shall follow procurement standards approved by the Secretary of Administration as well as applicable federal laws and regulations.

Control and direct the use and expenditures of all monies appropriated by the State for transportation purposes and prepare and use a budget for these expenditures.

Exercise general supervision of all transportation functions, have the right to direct traffic on all State highways that are under construction and maintenance, and may close all or any part of a State highway that is under construction or repair. The Agency shall maintain detours comprising State or town highways, or both, around planned closures of State highways in excess of 72 hours. If the Agency maintains a detour on a town highway it shall be responsible for repairing any damage to the town highway caused by the detoured traffic.

Cause necessary surveys, maps, plans, specifications, and estimates to be made for the improvement, construction, and maintenance of transportation facilities.

Furnish technical and engineering assistance when requested, at cost, if available, to the various municipalities of the State.

Advise town officers as to the construction, improvement, and maintenance of town highways, when requested.

Erect and maintain appropriate traffic control devices on State highways.

Require any contractor or contractors employed in any project of the Agency for construction of a transportation improvement to file in the office of the Secretary a good and sufficient surety bond to the State of Vermont, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this State in such sum as the Agency shall direct, conditioned for the compliance by the contractor or contractors and their agents and servants, with all matters and things set forth and specified to be by the principal kept, done, and performed at the time and in the manner in the contract between the Agency and the contractor or contractors specified and to pay over, make good, and reimburse the State of Vermont for all loss or losses and damage or damages that the State of Vermont may sustain by reason of failure or default on the part of the contractor or contractors. The Agency is authorized to require any other condition in the bond that may from time to time be necessary. The Secretary at his or her discretion as to the best interest of the State, may accept other good and sufficient surety in lieu of a bond and, in cases involving contracts for $100,000.00 or less, may waive the requirement of a performance bond.

Require any contractor or contractors employed in any project of the Agency for construction of a transportation improvement to file an additional surety bond to the Secretary and the Secretary’s successor in office, for the benefit of labor, materialmen, and others, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this State, in such sum as the Agency shall direct, conditioned for the payment, settlement, liquidation, and discharge of the claims of all creditors for material, merchandise, labor, rent, hire of vehicles, power shovels, rollers, concrete mixers, tools, and other appliances, professional services, premiums, and other services used or employed in carrying out the terms of the contract between the contractor and the State and further conditioned for the payment of taxes both State and municipal, and contributions to the Vermont Commissioner of Labor, accruing during the term of performance of the contract. However, in order to obtain the benefit of the security, the claimant shall file with the Secretary a sworn statement of the claimant’s claim, within 90 days after the final acceptance of the project by the State or within 90 days from the time the taxes or contributions to the Vermont Commissioner of Labor are due and payable, and, within one year after the filing of the claim, shall bring a petition in the Superior Court in the name of the Secretary, with notice and summons to the principal, surety, and the Secretary, to enforce the claim or intervene in a petition already filed. The Secretary may, if the Secretary determines that it is in the best interests of the State, accept other good and sufficient surety in lieu of a bond.

Purchase, rent, lease, operate, and maintain the machinery, trucks, and equipment necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and in its discretion let trucks and other machinery under such terms as it determines.

With the approval of the Governor, purchase, rent, lease, or erect suitable garages and other buildings as may be necessary for the care of its machinery, trucks, materials, and equipment.

Consult with the Agency of Natural Resources prior to engaging in road repairs or construction that in any way involve streams, ponds, or lakes.

Furnish, subject to reimbursement and upon request by a municipality, services as may be necessary for the municipality to comply with the “Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970” or any subsequent amendments to the Act.

With respect to State highways, have the same powers that selectboards have with respect to town highways.

Respond in writing to concerns raised during Transportation Board hearings conducted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 5(d)(6) and subsection 10g(d) of this title.

Inform the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee of any anticipated loss or reduction of federal funding for transportation purposes due to either a lack of State funds for matching or a decrease in federal funds for the Transportation Program.

Administer the Statewide Property Parcel Mapping Program.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 35

, §§ 5, 14, eff. May 18, 1991;

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 8, eff. May 15, 1992;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 22, 1996;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2017, No. 38

, § 12;

2021, No. 20

, § 77.

§ 10a.
Procurement of engineering and design services through competitive negotiation.

For purposes of this section, “competitive negotiation” means a method of procurement where proposals are requested from a number of sources and either a fixed-price or cost-reimbursable type contract is awarded, as appropriate.

Contracts for program management, construction management, feasibility studies, preliminary engineering, design engineering, surveying, mapping, or architectural-related services with respect to projects subject to the provisions of section 111(a) of the Surface Transportation and Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1987, Pub. L. No. 100-17, as may be amended, may be awarded by competitive negotiation.

If competitive negotiation is used, the following requirements shall apply:

Proposals shall be solicited from an adequate number of qualified sources to permit reasonable competition, consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. All qualified sources may submit a proposal. The request for proposals shall be publicized.

The request for proposal shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price or cost where required and their relative importance.

The Agency shall provide mechanisms for technical evaluation of the proposals received, determinations of responsible offerors for the purpose of written or oral discussions, and selection for contract award.

Award may be made to the responsible offeror whose proposal will be most advantageous to the Agency, price and other factors considered. Unsuccessful offerors should be notified promptly.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 91

, § 9, eff. June 22, 1987; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 78.